Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.020

Governor responsible for administration of traffic safety program—Acceptance and disbursal of federal funds.

The governor shall be responsible for the administration of the traffic safety program of the state and shall be the official of the state having ultimate responsibility for dealing with the federal government with respect to all programs and activities of the state and local governments pursuant to the Highway Safety Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-564; 80 Stat. 731). The governor is authorized and empowered to accept and disburse federal grants or other funds or donations from any source for the purpose of improving traffic safety programs in the state of Washington, and is hereby empowered to contract and to do all other things necessary in behalf of this state to secure the full benefits available to this state under the federal Highway Safety Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-564; 80 Stat. 731) and in so doing, to cooperate with federal and state agencies, agencies private and public, interested organizations, and with individuals, to effectuate the purposes of that enactment, and any and all subsequent amendments thereto.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 2.]